North Carolina, session 2025, HB1107.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to assist with recruitment,
training, and support to families providing foster care. These funds shall be distributed to county
departments of social services based on documented need.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1107-v-1*